incubator/apertium-en-sq/apertium-en-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="d/ua__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uam</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uami</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uash</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uani</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uatë</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uanë</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashkësha</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashkëshim</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashkëshe</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashkëshit</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashkësh</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashkëshin</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashkam</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashkemi</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashke</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashkeni</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashka</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashkan</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="adp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uaj</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oni</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e i="yes">
        <p>
          <l>ua</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashça</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashçim</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashç</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashçi</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashstë</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashçin</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="opt"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ashur</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oja</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onim</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onit</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onte</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onin</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ua</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uam</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oni</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uan</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esha</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eshëm</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eshe</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eshët</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eshi</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eshën</l>
          <r>ua<s n="vblex"/><s n="psi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="dua"><i>d</i><par n="d/ua__vblex"/></e>
